Maryland, session 2025, HB0685.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 790 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
21–102.
This title applies only in Garrett County.
21–804.
(a) There is a Class BDR (deluxe restaurant) beer and wine license.
(f) The Board shall:
(1) charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount equal to
the annual license fee; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
21–903.
(a) There is a Class BDR (deluxe restaurant) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(f) The Board shall:
(1) charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount equal to
the annual license fee; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
21–1002.1.
(a) There is a Class B–resort beer and wine license.
(f) The Board shall:
(1) charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount equal to
the annual license fee; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
21–1002.2.
(a) There is a Class B–resort beer, wine, and liquor license.
(f) The Board shall:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 790
(1) charge a one–time issuing fee for a new license in an amount equal to
the annual license fee; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
21–1002.3.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS BC–RESORT BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A LICENSE HOLDER FOR A
COMPLEX THAT HAS AT LEAST TWO FACILITIES THAT ARE:
(1) LOCATED ON THE SAME CONTIGUOUS PROPERTY THAT IS AT
LEAST 20 ACRES IN SIZE;
(2) SEPARATED BY AT LEAST 150 FEET FROM THE MAIN AREA OF THE
LICENSED PREMISES; AND
(3) DETERMINED BY THE BOARD TO BE HOTEL, MOTEL,
RECREATIONAL, OR RESTAURANT FACILITIES.
(C) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL AT A HOTEL,
MOTEL, RECREATIONAL, OR RESTAURANT FACILITY AT RETAIL AT THE PLACE
DESCRIBED IN THE LICENSE:
(1) BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION; AND
(2) BEER FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(D) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR DURING THE
HOURS AND DAYS AS SET OUT FOR A CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE
UNDER § 21–2004 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEES ARE:
(1) $3,000 FOR A 6–DAY LICENSE FOR TWO FACILITIES;
(2) $1,500 FOR EACH ADDITIONAL FACILITY FOR A 6–DAY LICENSE;
(3) $3,500 FOR A 7–DAY LICENSE FOR TWO FACILITIES; AND
(4) $1,750 FOR EACH ADDITIONAL FACILITY FOR A 7–DAY LICENSE.
– 3 –

Ch. 790 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(F) THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) CHARGE A ONE–TIME ISSUING FEE FOR A NEW LICENSE IN AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
21–804.1.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS BDR–DC (DELUXE COMPLEX RESTAURANT) BEER
AND WINE LICENSE.
(B) THE LICENSE MAY BE ISSUED TO A HOLDER OF:
(1) ANY CLASS B ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES LICENSE ISSUED BY THE
BOARD; OR
(2) AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE THAT THE LOCAL LICENSING BOARD OF
A DIFFERENT JURISDICTION ISSUES ONLY FOR USE BY A RESTAURANT.
(C) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE FOR USE BY A DELUXE
COMPLEX RESTAURANT, AS DEFINED IN THE REGULATIONS OF THE BOARD, THAT:
(I) HAS SEATING FOR AT LEAST 20 INDIVIDUALS; AND
(II) HAS A MINIMUM CAPITAL INVESTMENT OF $25,000 FOR THE
RESTAURANT FACILITIES, NOT INCLUDING THE COST OF LAND OR BUILDINGS.
(2) IF THE APPLICANT PURCHASES OR LEASES AN EXISTING
BUILDING, THE CAPITAL INVESTMENT ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE COST OF THE LAND
AND IMPROVEMENTS SHALL BE BASED ON THE ASSESSED VALUE OF THE LAND AND
IMPROVEMENTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RECORDS OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT
OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION AT THE TIME OF PURCHASE.
(3) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL, AT
RETAIL, AT THE PLACE DESCRIBED IN THE LICENSE:
(I) BEER AND WINE FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION; AND
(II) BEER FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(D) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE WITH A CATERING OPTION.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 790
(2) IN ADDITION TO EXERCISING THE PRIVILEGES STATED IN
SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION, A HOLDER OF A LICENSE WITH A CATERING
OPTION MAY SELL BEER AND WINE FOR CONSUMPTION AT EVENTS THAT THE
LICENSE HOLDER CATERS OFF THE LICENSED PREMISES.
(3) TO EXERCISE THE CATERING OPTION, THE LICENSE HOLDER
SHALL PROVIDE FOOD AT THE CATERED EVENT.
(4) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY EXERCISE THE CATERING OPTION
ONLY DURING THE HOURS AND DAYS THAT THE BOARD ALLOWS.
(E) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEES ARE:
(1) $500 FOR A 6–DAY LICENSE WITHOUT A CATERING OPTION;
(2) $625 FOR A 6–DAY LICENSE WITH A CATERING OPTION;
(3) $585 FOR A 7–DAY LICENSE WITHOUT A CATERING OPTION; AND
(4) $710 FOR A 7–DAY LICENSE WITH A CATERING OPTION.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) CHARGE A ONE–TIME ISSUING FEE FOR A NEW LICENSE IN AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
21–903.1.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS BDR–DC (DELUXE COMPLEX RESTAURANT) BEER,
WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A HOLDER OF:
(1) ANY CLASS B ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES LICENSE ISSUED BY THE
BOARD; OR
(2) AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE THAT THE LOCAL LICENSING BOARD OF
A DIFFERENT JURISDICTION ISSUES ONLY FOR USE BY A RESTAURANT.
(C) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE FOR USE BY A DELUXE
COMPLEX RESTAURANT, AS DEFINED IN THE REGULATIONS OF THE BOARD, WITH:
– 5 –

Ch. 790 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) SEATING AT TABLES, NOT INCLUDING SEATS AT BARS OR
COUNTERS, FOR AT LEAST 20 INDIVIDUALS; AND
(II) A CAPITAL INVESTMENT OF AT LEAST $250,000 FOR THE
RESTAURANT FACILITIES, NOT INCLUDING THE COST OF LAND OR BUILDINGS.
(2) IF AN APPLICANT PURCHASES OR LEASES AN EXISTING BUILDING,
THE CAPITAL INVESTMENT ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE COST OF THE LAND AND
IMPROVEMENTS SHALL BE BASED ON THE ASSESSED VALUE OF THE LAND AND
IMPROVEMENTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RECORDS OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT
OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION AT THE TIME OF PURCHASE OR LEASE.
(3) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL, AT
RETAIL, AT THE PLACE DESCRIBED IN THE LICENSE:
(I) BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR FOR ON–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION; AND
(II) BEER FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(D) (1) A LICENSE HOLDER OF A CLASS BDR–DC (DELUXE COMPLEX
RESTAURANT) LICENSE MAY ACQUIRE A CATERING OPTION THAT AUTHORIZES THE
LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR FOR CONSUMPTION AT EVENTS
CATERED BY THE LICENSE HOLDER IN THE COUNTY OFF THE LICENSED PREMISES.
(2) A LICENSE HOLDER PROVIDING ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AT A
CATERED EVENT OFF THE LICENSED PREMISES SHALL ALSO PROVIDE FOOD.
(3) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY EXERCISE CATERING PRIVILEGES
ONLY DURING HOURS AND DAYS THAT ARE AUTHORIZED UNDER THE CLASS B
LICENSE.
(E) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEES ARE:
(1) $2,250 FOR A 6–DAY LICENSE WITHOUT A CATERING OPTION;
(2) $2,750 FOR A 6–DAY LICENSE WITH A CATERING OPTION;
(3) $2,625 FOR A 7–DAY LICENSE WITHOUT A CATERING OPTION; AND
(4) $3,125 FOR A 7–DAY LICENSE WITH A CATERING OPTION.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 790
(1) CHARGE A ONE–TIME ISSUING FEE FOR A NEW LICENSE IN AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
21–1002.3.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS BRC–RESORT COMPLEX BEER AND WINE LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A LICENSE HOLDER FOR A
COMPLEX THAT HAS AT LEAST TWO FACILITIES THAT ARE:
(1) LOCATED ON THE SAME CONTIGUOUS PROPERTY;
(2) SEPARATED BY AT LEAST 150 FEET FROM THE MAIN AREA OF THE
LICENSED PREMISES; AND
(3) DETERMINED BY THE BOARD TO BE HOTEL, MOTEL,
RECREATIONAL, OR RESTAURANT FACILITIES.
(C) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL AT A HOTEL,
MOTEL, RECREATIONAL, OR RESTAURANT FACILITY AT RETAIL AT THE PLACE
DESCRIBED IN THE LICENSE:
(1) BEER AND WINE FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION; AND
(2) BEER FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(D) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL BEER AND WINE DURING THE HOURS
AND DAYS AS SET OUT FOR A CLASS B BEER AND WINE LICENSE UNDER § 21–2003
OF THIS TITLE.
(E) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEES ARE:
(1) $700 FOR A 6–DAY LICENSE FOR TWO FACILITIES;
(2) $350 FOR EACH ADDITIONAL FACILITY FOR A 6–DAY LICENSE;
(3) $820 FOR A 7–DAY LICENSE FOR TWO FACILITIES; AND
(4) $410 FOR EACH ADDITIONAL FACILITY FOR A 7–DAY LICENSE.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL:
– 7 –

Ch. 790 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) CHARGE A ONE–TIME ISSUING FEE FOR A NEW LICENSE IN AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
21–1002.4.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS BRC–RESORT COMPLEX BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A LICENSE HOLDER FOR A
COMPLEX THAT HAS AT LEAST TWO FACILITIES THAT ARE:
(1) LOCATED ON THE SAME CONTIGUOUS PROPERTY;
(2) SEPARATED BY AT LEAST 150 FEET FROM THE MAIN AREA OF THE
LICENSED PREMISES; AND
(3) DETERMINED BY THE BOARD TO BE HOTEL, MOTEL,
RECREATIONAL, OR RESTAURANT FACILITIES.
(C) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL AT A HOTEL,
MOTEL, RECREATIONAL, OR RESTAURANT FACILITY AT RETAIL AT THE PLACE
DESCRIBED IN THE LICENSE:
(1) BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION; AND
(2) BEER FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(D) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR DURING THE
HOURS AND DAYS AS SET OUT FOR A CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE
UNDER § 21–2004 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEES ARE:
(1) $3,000 FOR A 6–DAY LICENSE FOR TWO FACILITIES;
(2) $1,500 FOR EACH ADDITIONAL FACILITY FOR A 6–DAY LICENSE;
(3) $3,500 FOR A 7–DAY LICENSE FOR TWO FACILITIES; AND
(4) $1,750 FOR EACH ADDITIONAL FACILITY FOR A 7–DAY LICENSE.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL:
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 790
(1) CHARGE A ONE–TIME ISSUING FEE FOR A NEW LICENSE IN AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
21–1304.
(a) (1) There is a beer festival license.
(2) The Board may issue not more than four beer festival licenses each
year.
(3) AN APPLICANT FOR THE LICENSE SHALL SUBMIT AN APPLICATION
ON THE FORM THAT THE BOARD PROVIDES.
(b) The Board may issue the license to a holder of:
(1) a retail license issued by the Board;
(2) a Class 5 brewery license;
(3) a Class 6 pub–brewery license;
(4) a Class 7 micro–brewery license;
(5) a Class 8 farm brewery license; or
(6) a person that is eligible to hold a Class C multiple day or multiple event
license.
(c) The license authorizes the holder to display and sell beer that is:
(1) manufactured and processed in any state; and
(2) distributed in the State when the license application is filed.
(d) A license holder may display and sell beer:
(1) at retail for on– and off–premises consumption; and
(2) during the hours and days designated for a beer festival.
(e) The Board shall [choose]:
(1) HOLD A HEARING ON A LICENSE APPLICATION;
– 9 –

Ch. 790 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) PUBLISH NOTICE OF THE LICENSE APPLICATION HEARING ONE
TIME AT LEAST 7 DAYS BEFORE THE HEARING;
[(1)] (3) CHOOSE a fixed period of time for the festival of up to 3
consecutive days, excluding Sunday; and
[(2)] (4) CHOOSE a location that is not already licensed.
(f) Notwithstanding subsection (e)(1) of this section, a holder of a beer festival
license issued for a location at which Sunday sales are allowed under § 21–2002(e) of this
title may make Sunday sales beginning at 10 a.m.
(g) Beer displayed and sold shall be:
(1) invoiced to the license holder by a wholesaler or holder of a Class 5
brewery license, Class 6 pub–brewery license, Class 7 micro–brewery license, or Class 8
farm brewery license; and
(2) delivered to the beer festival from the licensed premises of the
wholesaler.
(h) A holder of a State wholesaler’s license, a Class 5 brewery license, a Class 6
pub–brewery license, a Class 7 micro–brewery license, or a Class 8 farm brewery license
may enter into an agreement with the license holder to:
(1) deliver beer not earlier than 2 days before the effective date of the
license; and
(2) accept returns not later than 2 days after the expiration date of the
license.
(i) A person may hold a beer festival license in addition to another license.
(j) The Board shall set the fee.
(k) The Board shall adopt regulations to carry out this section.
21–1304.1.
(a) There is a Class C beer and wine street festival license.
(b) The Board may issue the license to a person that is eligible to hold a Class C
multiple day or multiple event license.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 790
(c) The license authorizes the holder to sell beer and wine for on–premises
consumption at an entertainment event that is:
(1) held in an arts and entertainment district; and
(2) if required, approved by the mayor and town council of the municipality
where the event is located.
(d) During an event for which the license is issued, an individual in the event area
approved by the Board who uses a designated container unique to the event may:
(1) purchase beer or wine from:
(i) the holder of the beer and wine street festival license; or
(ii) another license holder with on–sale privileges within the arts
and entertainment district;
(2) transport beer or wine in the designated container:
(i) to the premises of a license holder with on–sale privileges in the
arts and entertainment district; and
(ii) in the approved event area; and
(3) consume beer and wine:
(i) on the premises of a license holder with on–sale privileges in the
arts and entertainment district; and
(ii) in the approved event area.
(e) An applicant for the license shall submit an application on the form that the
Board provides.
(f) The Board shall:
(1) HOLD A HEARING ON A LICENSE APPLICATION; AND
(2) publish [a notice for applications for the license] NOTICE OF THE
LICENSE APPLICATION HEARING one time at least 7 days before [a license] THE hearing.
(g) A license holder may purchase beer and wine from a holder of a retail or
wholesaler’s license.
(h) The license holder:
– 11 –

Ch. 790 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) shall distribute a wristband to each individual who is at least 21 years
old at the event for which the license is issued; and
(2) may not serve beer or wine to an individual who does not wear a
wristband.
(i) The organization for which the license is issued shall ensure that at least one
server who is certified by an approved alcohol awareness program is on the premises when
alcoholic beverages are served.
(j) The license holder may hold another license of a different class or nature.
(k) The license may be used for a maximum of 26 days in a calendar year.
(l) The license fee is $50 per day.
(M) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
21–1304.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Festival” means the Garrett County Beer and Wine Festival.
(3) “Festival organization” means a nonprofit organization that is chosen
by the county in accordance with subsection (c) of this section to organize a festival.
(b) (1) There is a Garrett County Beer and Wine Festival.
(2) Under the supervision of the Board, the festival organization may
conduct the Festival annually for a fixed period of time of up to 3 consecutive days.
(c) (1) In selecting a nonprofit organization to be a festival organization, the
county shall ensure that the nonprofit organization has extensive experience in organizing
and managing large–scale public events.
(2) The Board may issue not more than four beer and wine festival licenses
each year.
(d) The Board may issue the license to a holder of a retail license or a person that
is eligible to hold a Class C multiple day or multiple event license.
(e) AN APPLICANT FOR THE LICENSE SHALL SUBMIT AN APPLICATION ON
THE FORM THAT THE BOARD PROVIDES.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 790
(F) The license authorizes the holder to display and sell beer and wine that is:
(1) manufactured and processed in or outside the State; and
(2) distributed in the State when the license application is filed.
[(f)] (G) A license holder shall display and sell beer and wine:
(1) at retail for on– and off–premises consumption; and
(2) during the hours and days designated for the beer and wine festival.
[(g)] (H) The Board shall:
(1) hold a hearing on a license application; and
(2) publish notice of [a] THE license application hearing [in a newspaper
of general circulation in the county] one time at least 7 days before the hearing.
[(h)] (I) (1) The Board shall choose a location for the festival that is not
already licensed.
(2) If the location chosen allows for Sunday sales, Sunday sales may begin
at 10 a.m.
[(i)] (J) Beer and wine displayed and sold shall be:
(1) invoiced to the license holder by a retailer or wholesaler; and
(2) delivered to the festival from the licensed premises of the retailer or
wholesaler.
[(j)] (K) A holder of a retail license or State wholesaler’s license may enter into
an agreement with the holder of the festival license to:
(1) deliver beer and wine not earlier than 2 days before the effective date
of the license; and
(2) accept returns not later than 5 days after the expiration date of the
license.
[(k)] (L) The Board shall establish the license fee.
[(l)] (M) The Board shall adopt regulations to carry out this section.
21–1304.3.
– 13 –

Ch. 790 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Festival” means the Garrett County Beer, Wine, and Liquor Festival.
(3) “Festival organization” means a nonprofit organization that is chosen
by the county in accordance with subsection (c) of this section to organize a festival.
(b) (1) There is a beer, wine, and liquor festival license.
(2) Under the supervision of the Board, the festival organization may
conduct the festival annually for a fixed period of time of up to 3 consecutive days.
(c) (1) In selecting a nonprofit organization to be a festival organization, the
county shall ensure that the nonprofit organization has extensive experience in organizing
and managing large–scale public events.
(2) The Board may issue not more than four beer, wine, and liquor festival
licenses each year.
(d) (1) The Board may issue the beer, wine, and liquor festival license to a
holder of a retail license or a person that is eligible to hold a Class C multiple day or
multiple event license.
(2) AN APPLICANT FOR THE LICENSE SHALL SUBMIT AN APPLICATION
ON THE FORM THAT THE BOARD PROVIDES.
(e) The license authorizes the license holder to display and sell beer, wine, and
liquor that is:
(1) manufactured and processed in or outside the State; and
(2) distributed in the State when the license application is filed.
(f) A license holder shall display and sell beer, wine, and liquor:
(1) at retail for on– and off–premises consumption; and
(2) during the hours and days designated for the festival.
(g) The Board shall:
(1) hold a hearing on a license application; and
(2) publish notice of [a] THE license application hearing [in a newspaper
of general circulation in the county] one time at least 7 days before the hearing.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 790
(h) (1) The Board shall choose a location for the festival that is not already
licensed.
(2) If the location chosen allows for Sunday sales, Sunday sales may begin
at 10 a.m.
(i) Beer, wine, and liquor displayed and sold shall be:
(1) invoiced to the license holder by a retailer or wholesaler; and
(2) delivered to the festival from the licensed premises of the retailer or
wholesaler.
(j) A holder of a retail license or State wholesaler’s license may enter into an
agreement with the holder of the beer, wine, and liquor festival license to:
(1) deliver beer, wine, and liquor not earlier than 2 days before the effective
date of the license; and
(2) accept returns not later than 5 days after the expiration date of the
license.
(k) The Board shall establish the beer, wine, and liquor festival license fee.
(l) The Board shall adopt regulations to carry out this section.
21–1305.
(a) (1) There is a wine festival license.
(2) The Board may issue not more than four wine festival licenses each
year.
(3) AN APPLICANT FOR THE LICENSE SHALL SUBMIT AN APPLICATION
ON THE FORM THAT THE BOARD PROVIDES.
(b) The Board may issue the license to:
(1) a holder of a retail license, Class 3 winery license, or Class 4 limited
winery license; or
(2) a person that is eligible to hold a Class C multiple day or multiple event
license.
(c) The license authorizes the holder to display and sell wine that is:
– 15 –

Ch. 790 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) manufactured and processed in any state; and
(2) distributed in the State when the license application is filed.
(d) A license holder shall display and sell wine:
(1) at retail for on– and off–premises consumption; and
(2) during the hours and days designated for the wine festival.
(e) The Board shall:
(1) hold a hearing on each license application; and
(2) publish notice of [a] THE license application hearing [in a newspaper
of general circulation in the county] one time at least 7 days before the hearing.
(f) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, each year the Board shall
choose up to 3 consecutive days for the wine festival.
(2) The Board shall choose a location that is not already licensed.
(3) A day chosen for the wine festival may not:
(i) be a Sunday; or
(ii) fall on the same weekend as the Maryland Wine Festival in
Carroll County.
(g) Notwithstanding subsection (f)(3)(i) of this section, a holder of a wine festival
license issued for use in a location where Sunday sales are allowed may make Sunday sales
beginning at 10 a.m.
(h) Wine displayed and sold shall be:
(1) invoiced to the license holder by a wholesaler, Class 3 winery, or Class
4 limited winery; and
(2) delivered to the wine festival from the licensed premises of the
wholesaler, Class 3 winery, or Class 4 limited winery.
(i) A holder of a State wholesale, Class 3 winery, or Class 4 limited winery license
may enter into an agreement with the license holder to:
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 790
(1) deliver wine not earlier than 2 days before the effective date of the
license; and
(2) accept returns not later than 5 days after the expiration date of the
license.
(j) The Board shall establish the license fee.
(k) The Board shall adopt regulations to carry out this section.
21–1309.
(a) The Board may issue a Class C multiple day beer license, beer and wine
license, and beer, wine, and liquor license to a [club] NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION for the
following fees and license types:
(1) $50 for a 2–day license;
(2) $150 for a 6–day license; and
(3) $300 for a 12–day license.
(b) The license holder may hold another license issued by the Board that is of a
different class or nature.
(c) The Board is not required to hold a hearing before issuing a license under this
section if a license holder anticipates attendance of fewer than 500 individuals at an event.
21–1310.
(a) The Board may issue a multiple event license to a [club] NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION that qualifies for a Class C multiple day license.
(b) The Board may not issue more than one multiple event license to a [club]
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION in a license year.
(c) The license holder may hold another license issued by the Board that is of a
different class or nature.
(d) (1) The Board shall publish a notice for application for the license one time
at least 7 days before a license hearing.
(2) A license holder shall notify the Board in writing at least 7 days before
an event for which the license is to be used.
– 17 –

Ch. 790 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) The [club] NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION for which a multiple event license is
issued shall ensure that at least one server who is certified by an approved alcohol
awareness program is on the premises when alcoholic beverages are served.
(f) The [club] NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION for which a multiple event license is
issued may cater functions on their premises.
(g) The fee for a Class C multiple event license is:
(1) $125 for not more than 5 events per year;
(2) $250 for not more than 12 events per year;
(3) $375 for not more than 18 events per year; and
(4) $500 for not more than 24 events per year.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 18 –